Maryland, session 2026, HB1378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1378*

HOUSE BILL 1378
SUBTITLE 6. LIMITATION ON ELECTION AND BALLOT ISSUE ACTIVITY.
1–601.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ARTIFICIAL PERSON POWERS” MEANS THE SAME POWERS AS AN
INDIVIDUAL TO DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT LAWFUL
BUSINESS OR CHARITABLE, COOPERATIVE, OR ORGANIZATIONAL PURPOSES.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL PERSON POWERS” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE POWER
TO DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ENGAGE IN ELECTION ACTIVITY OR BALLOT ISSUE
ACTIVITY.
(C) “BALLOT ISSUE ACTIVITY” MEANS PAYING, CONTRIBUTING, OR
EXPENDING MONEY OR ANYTHING OF VALUE TO SUPPORT OR OPPOSE ANY
INITIATIVE, REFERENDUM, RECALL, CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT, CHARTER
AMENDMENT, OR OTHER QUESTION THAT IS CERTIFIED OR SUBMITTED TO THE
ELECTORS OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
(D) “CHARTER PRIVILEGE” MEANS ANY BENEFIT THAT EXISTS ONLY
BECAUSE THE STATE HAS GRANTED THE BENEFIT TO AN ARTIFICIAL PERSON,
INCLUDING:
(1) ENTITIES OF LIMITED LIABILITY OR PERPETUAL DURATION;
(2) SUCCESSION IN ENTITY NAME; OR
(3) ANY STATUTORY LIMITATION ON THE PERSONAL LIABILITY OF
OWNERS, DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, MEMBERS, MANAGERS, PARTNERS, OR TRUSTEES.
(E) “DISGORGEMENT” MEANS A PAYMENT TO THE STATE OF AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO THE MONEY OR THING OF VALUE EXPENDED, CONTRIBUTED, OR
TRANSFERRED FOR ELECTION ACTIVITY OR BALLOT ISSUE ACTIVITY.
(F) (1) “ELECTION ACTIVITY” MEANS PAYING, CONTRIBUTING, OR
EXPENDING MONEY OR ANYTHING OF VALUE TO SUPPORT OR OPPOSE:
(I) A CANDIDATE;
(II) A POLITICAL PARTY;

HOUSE BILL 1378 3
(III) A POLITICAL COMMITTEE; OR
(IV) A NEWS ORGANIZATION THAT IS OWNED OR CONTROLLED
BY A CANDIDATE, POLITICAL PARTY, OR POLITICAL COMMITTEE.
(2) “ELECTION ACTIVITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE PAYING,
CONTRIBUTING, OR EXPENDING MONEY OR ANYTHING OF VALUE ON ANY BONA FIDE
NEWS STORY, COMMENTARY, OR EDITORIAL DISTRIBUTED THROUGH THE
FACILITIES OF AN INDEPENDENT NEWS ORGANIZATION.
1–602.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(1) ALL POLITICAL POWER IN THE STATE IS INHERENT IN THE
PEOPLE, AND THE CREATION OF AN ARTIFICIAL PERSON IS A PRIVILEGE GRANTED
BY THE STATE AND NOT A NATURAL RIGHT;
(2) UNDER § 1–102(E) OF THIS TITLE, THE CHARTER OF EVERY
ARTIFICIAL PERSON FORMED UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE IS SUBJECT TO
REPEAL OR MODIFICATION BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE;
(3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY RETAINS FULL AUTHORITY TO DEFINE,
REVISE, LIMIT, OR WITHDRAW THE POWERS AND PRIVILEGES GRANTED TO AN
ARTIFICIAL PERSON WHEN REQUIRED FOR THE PUBLIC GOOD;
(4) BROAD STATUTORY PROVISIONS IN STATE LAW THAT AUTHORIZE
ARTIFICIAL PERSONS TO DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO CARRY
OUT LAWFUL PURPOSES HAVE BEEN CONSTRUED TO INCLUDE PARTICIPATION IN
ELECTION AND BALLOT ISSUE ACTIVITY BUT THIS AUTHORITY WAS NEVER
INTENDED UNDER STATE LAW; AND
(5) EVERY ARTIFICIAL PERSON FORMED UNDER THE LAWS OF THE
STATE IS SUBJECT TO THE MODIFICATION OF THE LAWS OF THE STATE AND HAS NO
VESTED RIGHT TO THE CONTINUATION OF ANY GRANT OF POWER.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SUBTITLE IS TO REVOKE ANY PRIOR IMPLIED
AUTHORITY FOR ARTIFICIAL PERSONS TO ENGAGE IN ELECTION ACTIVITY OR
BALLOT ISSUE ACTIVITY AND GRANT ONLY THOSE POWERS NECESSARY OR
CONVENIENT FOR:
(1) LAWFUL BUSINESS;

HOUSE BILL 1378
(2) CHARITABLE, COOPERATIVE, OR ORGANIZATIONAL PURPOSES;
(3) ESTABLISHING A UNIFORM RULE ACROSS ALL FORMS OF
BUSINESS;
(4) PRESERVING THE RIGHTS OF NATURAL PERSONS; OR
(5) ENSURING THAT NO AUTHORITY REVOKED IN THIS SUBTITLE IS
REVIVED BY IMPLICATION OR JUDICIAL CONSTRUCTION.
1–603.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO DOMESTIC OR FOREIGN ARTIFICIAL
PERSONS FORMED, ORGANIZED, OR AUTHORIZED UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE,
INCLUDING:
(1) CORPORATIONS;
(2) NONSTOCK CORPORATIONS;
(3) PROFESSIONAL CORPORATIONS;
(4) LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES;
(5) LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS;
(6) LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIPS;
(7) REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUSTS;
(8) STATUTORY TRUSTS;
(9) BUSINESS TRUSTS; AND
(10) REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUSTS, STATUTORY TRUSTS,
BUSINESS TRUSTS, OR SIMILAR ARRANGEMENTS TO THE EXTENT STATE LAW
GRANTS LIMITED LIABILITY, PERPETUAL DURATION, SUCCESSION IN NAME, OR ANY
OTHER CHARTER PRIVILEGE.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) NATURAL PERSONS ACTING IN AN INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY; OR

HOUSE BILL 1378 5
(2) ANY AGENCY, INSTRUMENTALITY, OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF
THE STATE.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE RESTRICTS THE LAWFUL ACTIVITIES OF
POLITICAL COMMITTEES ORGANIZED UNDER LAW.
1–604.
(A) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING § 1–403 OF THIS TITLE OR ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF LAW, AN ARTIFICIAL PERSON MAY NOT ENGAGE IN ELECTION
ACTIVITY OR BALLOT ISSUE ACTIVITY.
(2) IF AN ARTIFICIAL PERSON ENGAGES IN ELECTION ACTIVITY OR
BALLOT ISSUE ACTIVITY, THE ACTIVITY SHALL BE CONSIDERED ULTRA VIRES, VOID,
AND UNENFORCEABLE.
(B) AN ELECTION ACTIVITY OR BALLOT ISSUE ACTIVITY MAY NOT BE
RATIFIED, VALIDATED, OR GIVEN EFFECT BY ESTOPPEL, RELIANCE, OR ANY OTHER
EQUITABLE DOCTRINE.
1–605.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES AND REGULATIONS
NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT AND ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE FOR:
(1) ADMINISTRATIVE DETERMINATION OF VIOLATIONS; AND
(2) PROCEDURES FOR:
(I) FORFEITURE AND REINSTATEMENT OF CHARTER
PRIVILEGES;
(II) CERTIFICATION OF COMPLIANCE FOLLOWING
DISGORGEMENT;
(III) NOTICE AND OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD THAT IS
CONSISTENT WITH DUE PROCESS; AND
(IV) COORDINATION WITH THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL.

HOUSE BILL 1378
2–101.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A CORPORATION
FORMED UNDER THIS TITLE IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
4–201.1.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A CLOSE CORPORATION
IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
4A–203.2.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A LIMITED LIABILITY
COMPANY IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
5–704.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A CORPORATION
FORMED UNDER THIS TITLE IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
7–106.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A FOREIGN
CORPORATION REGISTERED UNDER THIS TITLE IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE
6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
8–601.1.
(A) Sections 2–113, 2–116 through 2–118, 2–201(c), 2–309(a) and (e), 2–313,
2–502(e), 2–503(b), 2–504(f), and 2–701 through 2–707 of this article and, except as
otherwise provided in § 8–601 of this subtitle or in the declaration of trust, § 2–405.1 of this
article shall apply to real estate investment trusts.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A REAL ESTATE
INVESTMENT TRUST IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
9A–108.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A PARTNERSHIP IS
SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
10–108.

HOUSE BILL 1378 7
(A) The provisions of Title 9A of this article with respect to partnerships shall
apply to limited partnerships except to the extent that those provisions are inconsistent
with or are modified by the provisions of this title.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A LIMITED
PARTNERSHIP IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
12–106.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A STATUTORY TRUST IS
SUBJECT TO TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.